Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-419
Inhaling or drinking certain intoxicating substances; unlawful.

No person shall breathe, inhale, or drink any compound, liquid, or chemical containing acetate, acetone, benzene, butyl alcohol, cyclohexanone, ethyl acetate, ethyl alcohol, ethylene dichloride, ethylene trichloride, hexane, isopropanol, isopropyl alcohol, methyl alcohol, methyl cellosolve acetate, methyl ethyl ketone, methyl isobutyl ketone, pentachlorophenol, petroleum ether, toluene, toluol, trichloroathane, trichloroethylene, or any other substance for the purpose of inducing a condition of intoxication, stupefaction, depression, giddiness, paralysis, inebriation, excitement, or irrational behavior, or in any manner changing, distorting, or disturbing the auditory, visual, mental, or nervous processes. For the purposes of sections 28-419 to 28-424, any such condition so induced shall be deemed an intoxicated condition.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 79;

Laws 2007, LB424, § 1.